Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.321

Western College fund—Appropriations to be paid from general fund.

From and after the first day of April, 1955, all appropriations made by the thirty-fourth legislature from the Western College fund shall be paid out of moneys in the general fund.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.321. Prior: 1955 c 335 s 2.]